Colorado, session 2026A, HB1384.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-115, amend
(1.5) as follows:
22-54-115. Distribution from state public school fund.
(1.5) Any school district may give written instructions to the state
board directing that a specified portion of a monthly payment or monthly
payments that the district is otherwise entitled to receive pursuant to this
section shall be transferred to the department of labor and employment for
the district's cost of participating in school-to-work alliance programs.
These written instructions shall specify the amount to be transferred to the
department of labor and employment from the district's payment for a
specified month or months. The written instructions shall be given to the
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

state board no later than the fifth day of the first month in which such
amount is to be transferred to the department of labor and employment. THE
TRANSFER OF THE SPECIFIED PORTION OF A DISTRICT'S MONTHLY PAYMENT
OR MONTHLY PAYMENTS THAT THE DISTRICT INSTRUCTS SHOULD NOT BE
PAID BUT INSTEAD TRANSFERRED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT IS NOT STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING FOR PURPOSES OF
SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1384

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1384